District of Columbia statutes.
29-403.01

Purposes.

(a)

A nonprofit corporation may be formed for any lawful nonprofit purpose unless a more limited purpose is set forth in the articles of incorporation.

(b)

A corporation engaging in an activity that is subject to regulation under another statute of the District may incorporate under this chapter only if incorporating under this chapter is not prohibited by the other statute. The corporation is subject to all the limitations of the other statute.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History